Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 35 Private Protective Services Licensing and Regulatory Act
62-35-117. Registration cards — Qualifications of applicants.

Each applicant for a registration card must:

Be at least twenty-one (21) years of age if applying for an armed registration card or at least eighteen (18) years of age if applying for unarmed registration;

Be a citizen of the United States or resident alien;

Not have been declared by any court of competent jurisdiction incompetent by reason of mental defect or disease unless a court of competent jurisdiction has since declared the applicant competent;

If convicted in any jurisdiction of any of the crimes listed in this subdivision (4), have completed serving sentence or court ordered probation at least five (5) years prior to application. Conviction of the following crimes shall disqualify an applicant, subject to the conditions stated in this section:

Any felony; or

Any misdemeanor involving:

Shooting a firearm or other weapon;

Shoplifting;

Assault and battery or other act of violence against persons or property;

Crimes involving the sale, manufacture or distribution of controlled substances, controlled substance analogues, drugs or narcotics;

Theft of property; or

Theft of services;

Not be suffering from habitual drunkenness or narcotics addiction or dependence;

Not have any disability that, in the opinion of the commissioner, prevents the applicant from performing the duties of a security guard/officer; and

Be of good moral character.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 17; 1988, ch. 987, § 16; 1993, ch. 200, § 2; 2012, ch. 848, § 64.

Attorney General Opinions. Any person, including a sworn peace officer regardless of jurisdiction, who meets the statutory qualifications and requirements, may act as a security guard for a licensed contract security company, OAG 00-166, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 169 (10/24/00).

The Eligibility Verification for Entitlements Act (EVEA) can be read in harmony with laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or U.S. citizens or resident aliens and therefore did not impliedly repeal those laws. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens also violate the Equal Protection Clause because they discriminate based on alienage and would not satisfy strict scrutiny. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. Laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens do not violate the Equal Protection Clause, however, because they discriminate only against unlawful aliens and lawful aliens who are not permanent residents. Those categories of aliens are not a suspect class, and the laws at issue would likely satisfy rational basis review. The Department of Commerce and Insurance is not required to enforce the requirements that an applicant for licensure, registration, or certification be a “citizen of the United States” or a “citizen of the United States or resident alien.” OAG 18-42, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (9/13/2018).

62-35-118. Registration cards — Training and examination of applicants.

Within fifteen (15) days of employment, an unarmed security guard/officer applicant must complete general training and pass an examination and an armed security guard/officer applicant must complete general training, pass an examination and complete the training in subsection (b) within sixty (60) days of employment.

Both unarmed security guard/officer and armed security guard/officer applicants must complete at least four (4) hours of general training administered by a certified trainer and pass an examination, covering at least the following subjects:

Orientation: one (1) hour;

Legal powers and limitations of a security guard/officer: one (1) hour;

Emergency procedures: one (1) hour; and

General duties: one (1) hour.

For applicants for private security guard/officer registration who will carry a club, stun gun, chemical spray, night stick or other less than lethal device, the commissioner shall require appropriate training specific to the device by a certified trainer who is certified to instruct for the specific device. It shall be the employers' responsibility to keep training records of their employees for each specific device. The security guard/officer shall also have in the person's possession a certification card issued by an instructor/trainer who is certified to instruct/train in the legal use of the specific device and shall exhibit the card upon demand by the commissioner, the commissioner's duly authorized agent or any full-time law enforcement officer.

If applying for an armed security guard/officer registration card, before being issued a firearm, the applicant must also:

Complete at least eight (8) additional classroom hours of firearms training administered by a certified trainer and pass an examination covering at least the following subjects:

Legal limitations of the use of a firearm;

Handling of a firearm; and

Safety and maintenance; and

Complete at least four (4) hours of marksmanship training administered by a certified trainer, and achieve a minimum of seventy percent (70%) on any silhouette target course approved by the commissioner.

A certified trainer shall submit a statement to the commissioner certifying that an applicant has satisfactorily completed the required training within fifteen (15) days of training.

The requirements of subsection (a) do not apply to those applicants for registration as unarmed security guards/officers who have at least one (1) year of experience as a security guard/officer as of July 1, 1988, or who have had no less than four (4) hours of training equivalent to that required in subsection (a) in the year prior to filing the application.

The requirements of subsection (b) do not apply to those applicants for registration as armed security guards/officers who have had no less than twelve (12) hours of training equivalent to that required in subsection (b) in the year prior to filing the application.

The requirements of subsections (a) and (b) do not apply to an applicant for registration who is a sworn peace officer and certified by the police officer standards and training commission. The commissioner may issue a temporary registration card to the officer upon the commissioner's verification of the officer's certification.

The requirements of subsection (a) do not apply to an applicant for registration who is a state or local correctional officer or jailer; provided, that the state officer has successfully completed the appropriate basic training required by § 41-1-116 and is current on all annual refresher courses required by § 41-1-116 and the local officer or jailer has successfully completed comparable basic training and annual in-service training courses. The commissioner may issue a temporary registration card to the officer upon the commissioner's verification that the officer meets the requirements of this subdivision (d)(4).

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 18; 1988, ch. 987, §§ 5-7; 1993, ch. 200, § 3; 1995, ch. 249, § 1; 1996, ch. 1009, § 4; 1997, ch. 369, § 1; 2004, ch. 661, § 1; 2006, ch. 1013, §§ 1, 2; 2020, ch. 580, §§ 10, 12, 13.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “unarmed security guard/officer applicant must complete” for “unarmed guard applicant shall complete” and “armed security guard/officer applicant must complete” for “armed guard applicant shall complete”; substituted “Both unarmed security guard/officer and armed security guard/officer applicants must complete” for “Both the armed and unarmed guard applicants shall complete” in (a)(2); and substituted “security guard/officer” for “security officer/guard” twice in (a)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 580, § 19. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Applicability of section to unarmed security guards or officers, § 62-35-103.

Carrying of firearms by guards, § 62-35-125.

Certified trainers, instructors, § 62-35-126.

62-35-119. Registration cards — Investigation of applicants — Issuance or denial of cards.

Upon receipt of an application for a registration card, the commissioner:

Shall conduct an investigation to determine whether the statements made in the application are true;

Shall cause the applicant's fingerprints to be compared with fingerprints filed with the Tennessee bureau of investigation; and

If the application is for an armed security guard/officer registration card, shall, or if the application is for an unarmed security guard/officer registration card may, submit the applicant's fingerprints and photograph to the federal bureau of investigation for a search of its files to determine whether the applicant has any recorded convictions.

The department of commerce and insurance has the authority to query the Tennessee bureau of investigation's Tennessee criminal history records system for the following information:

Tennessee criminal history records;

Tennessee repository for apprehension of persons (TRAP); and

State of Tennessee orders of protection files (STOP).

The records may be used in lieu of fingerprint background checks for the issuance of unarmed security guard/officer registrations, if requested.

Pending issuance, denial, or renewal of a registration card by the commissioner, the applicant may work as an unarmed security guard/officer, if the applicant submits a completed application form, one (1) set of classifiable electronic fingerprints, one (1) head-and-shoulder photograph taken within the last six (6) months, and the application fee to the commissioner, and the applicant keeps a copy of the completed application form on the applicant's person while on duty.

The commissioner shall issue to a qualified applicant a registration card for armed security guard/officer or unarmed security guard/officer registration upon receipt of the appropriate payment of fees and a statement from a certified trainer that the training required by this chapter has been completed. The commissioner shall establish the appropriate amounts for the fees required by this subsection (c).

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 19; 1988, ch. 987, § 8; 1990, ch. 1026, § 6; 1991, ch. 425, § 3; 1995, ch. 249, § 2; 2000, ch. 705, § 1; 2006, ch. 1013, § 3; 2020, ch. 580, §§ 6-8, 14.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “or for the issuance of conditional armed security guard/officer registrations” following “registrations” in (a)(2)(B); in (b), substituted “one (1) set” for “three (3) sets”, inserted “electronic”, substituted “one (1) head-and-shoulder photograph” for “three (3) sets of head-and-shoulder photographs”, and deleted the former last six sentences, which read: “The applicant may only work using the completed application form for seventy-five (75) business days from the date that the completed application form, three (3) sets of classifiable fingerprints, three (3) sets of head-and-shoulder photographs taken within the last six (6) months and the application fee are received by the commissioner, pending the issuance or denial of the registration card by the commissioner. A qualified applicant may receive a conditional armed registration card pending receipt of the federal bureau of investigation report. The commissioner shall notify the applicant by postcard that all elements required for the armed registration card have been satisfied, except for receipt of the federal bureau of investigation report. The applicant may use the postcard as a conditional armed registration card until the application is ultimately granted or denied. The postcard shall include an expiration date, which shall be established by the department. If no determination is made on the original application before the expiration of the conditional armed registration card, a second conditional armed registration card may be issued.”; substituted “armed security guard/officer or unarmed security guard/officer” for “armed or unarmed security officer” in (c)(1); and deleted former (c)(2) which read: “The commissioner shall issue to a qualified applicant who is a sworn peace officer a registration card for armed or unarmed security officer registration upon receipt of the appropriate payment of fees and verification of the officer's police officer standards and training commission certification.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 580, § 19. July 1, 2020.

62-35-120. Registration cards — Possession and exhibition — Notice of arrest and conviction.

The application or registration card shall be exhibited upon request of the commissioner, the commissioner's designee, a full-time law enforcement officer or an employer to verify that the security guard/officer is working pursuant to the requirements of this chapter.

A security guard/officer shall provide written notice to the commissioner or the commissioner's designee and to the licensee or the proprietary security organization that employs the security guard/officer of any arrest and resulting conviction, except for minor traffic violations, within thirty (30) days of the arrest or conviction.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 20; 1996, ch. 1009, §§ 1, 10; 2006, ch. 1013, § 4; 2020, ch. 580, § 10.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “security guard/officer” for “security officer/guard” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 580, § 19. July 1, 2020.

62-35-121. Registration cards — Not transferable or assignable.

No registration card shall be transferable or assignable.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 21.

62-35-122. Registration cards — Expiration — Renewal.

All registration cards or renewals of registration cards shall expire two (2) years from date of issuance.

The commissioner shall establish the fees in reasonable amounts for the timely renewal of armed or unarmed registration cards.

Registrations may be renewed up to three (3) months after their expiration by payment of the renewal fee plus a penalty established by the commissioner for each month or portion of a month that elapses before payment is tendered.

Every armed security guard/officer shall as a prerequisite for the renewal of the person's registration card:

Complete four (4) hours of refresher training administered by a certified trainer in the subjects listed in § 62-35-118(b)(1); and

Requalify in the use of a firearm by achieving a minimum of seventy percent (70%) on any silhouette target course approved by the commissioner.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 22; 1988, ch. 987, § 9; 1990, ch. 1026, § 7; 1991, ch. 425, § 4; 1996, ch. 1009, § 11.

62-35-123. Notice to commissioner prior to acting as proprietary security organization.

It is unlawful for any person to act as a proprietary security organization without first having notified the commissioner in writing. The notice shall include:

The full name and business address of the proprietary security organization;

The full name and the business and residence addresses of the qualifying manager; and

Other information that the commissioner may reasonably require.

Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (a), a hospital that employs only unarmed security guards/officers may voluntarily elect to submit to the requirements for a proprietary security organization under this chapter and evidence the election by filing with the commissioner the notice required in subsection (a). The notice is revocable by the hospital at any time upon appropriate notice of revocation.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 23; 1988, ch. 987, § 10.

Attorney General Opinions. License for Church Congregations Using Volunteer Members for Security Purposes, OAG 15-64, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 64 (8/21/15).

62-35-124. Registration cards — Notice concerning eligibility to hold.

A licensee or proprietary security organization shall immediately notify the commissioner upon receipt of any information relating to a registrant's continuing eligibility to hold a registration card under this chapter.

A licensee or proprietary security organization shall provide written notice to the commissioner or the commissioner's designee of any arrest or conviction, or both, except for minor traffic violations, within thirty (30) days of being notified or learning of the arrest or conviction, or both, of:

The licensee or its qualifying agent; or

Any person employed as a security guard/officer by the licensee or the proprietary security organization.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 24; 1996, ch. 1009, § 2; 2020, ch. 580, § 10.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “security guard/officer” for “security officer/guard” in (b)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 580, § 19. July 1, 2020.

62-35-125. Carrying of weapons by security guards/officers.

An armed security guard/officer may carry only the types of firearms that the commissioner prescribes, by rules and regulations, in the performance of the person's duties. A security guard/officer may carry a firearm only if certified to carry the firearm. With proper certification, an unarmed or armed security guard/officer may carry any other type weapon, including, but not be limited to, clubs or batons, stun guns, the chemical spray known as mace or any other tool or weapon that the commissioner may prescribe.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 25; 1988, ch. 987, § 11; 1996, ch. 1009, § 12; 1997, ch. 369, § 4; 2020, ch. 580, § 10.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “security guard/officer” for “security officer/guard” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 580, § 19. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Unlawful activities regarding firearms, § 62-35-134.

62-35-126. Certified trainers — Instructors.

An individual is eligible to become a certified trainer only if the individual:

Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age;

Has at least one (1) year of supervisory experience satisfactory to the commissioner with a contract security company or proprietary security organization or with any federal, United States military, state, county or municipal law enforcement agency; and

Is personally qualified to conduct the training required by this chapter.

A certified trainer may, in the trainer's discretion, instruct personally or use a combination of personal instruction, audio or visual training aids.

To assist in the implementation of the training program, the certified trainer may appoint as an instructor any individual who:

Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age; and

Has at least one (1) year of experience with any federal, United States military, state, county or municipal law enforcement agency or with a contract security company or proprietary security organization.

A certified trainer may be an employee of a contract security company or proprietary security organization.

The certified trainer shall certify to the successful completion of training required by this chapter and shall submit the certification to the commissioner prior to issuance of a registration card or renewal of the registration card, in the case of armed security guards/officers.

All certifications shall expire the last day of the twenty-fourth month from issuance or renewal. The commissioner shall establish reasonable fees for the timely renewal of certifications.

Certifications may be renewed up to three (3) months after their expiration by payment of the renewal fee, plus a penalty established by the commissioner for each month or portion of a month that elapses before payment is tendered.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 26; 1988, ch. 987, § 12; 1990, ch. 1026, § 8; 1996, ch. 1009, § 27; 2008, ch. 1038, § 17.

Attorney General Opinions. The commissioner of commerce and insurance is free to consider a National Rifle Association certificate in deciding whether an applicant is “personally qualified to conduct the training” of security guards; however, such a certificate is merely one aspect of this decision and the commissioner may look at all the material included with the individual's application and conclude that, based on all the experience the individual is personally qualified to conduct the training required under the statute, OAG 01-163, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 167 (11/5/01).

62-35-127. Prohibited law enforcement representations on badges, insignias, vehicles or equipment.

While performing any function of a security guard and patrol service, no person shall:

Wear or display any badge, insignia, shield, patch or pattern that:

Indicates or tends to indicate that the person is a sworn peace officer;

Contains or includes the word “police” or the equivalent of the word “police;” or

Is similar in wording to any law enforcement agency in this state; or

Have or utilize any vehicle or equipment that:

Displays the words “police,” “law enforcement officer,” or the equivalent of those words; or

Has any sign, shield, accessory or insignia that may indicate that the vehicle or equipment belongs to a public law enforcement agency.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 27.

Attorney General Opinions. A law enforcement officer working for a security company outside of the officer's jurisdiction may not self-identify as a law enforcement officer in a non-departmental issued uniform, OAG 00-166, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 169 (10/24/00).

Part-time officers as licensed security guards. OAG 12-77, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (7/25/12).

62-35-128. Restrictions regarding military or police-style uniforms.

No security guard/officer shall wear any military or police-style uniform, except for rainwear or other foul-weather clothing, unless the uniform has:

Affixed over the left breast pocket on the outermost garment and on any cap a badge or insignia distinct in design from that utilized by any law enforcement agency in this state, unless the licensed security guard/officer is in plain clothes; and

Affixed over the right breast pocket on the outermost garment a name plate or tape with the name of the security guard/officer on it, unless the licensed security guard/officer is in plain clothes.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 28; 1996, ch. 1009, § 13; 2020, ch. 580, § 15.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “security guard/officer” for “security officer” in (1) and following "licensed" in (2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 580, § 19. July 1, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. A law enforcement officer working for a security company outside of the officer's jurisdiction may not self-identify as a law enforcement officer in a non-departmental issued uniform, OAG 00-166, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 169 (10/24/00).

62-35-129. Administration and enforcement of chapter — Rules and regulations.

The commissioner shall be responsible for administering and enforcing this chapter.

The commissioner may promulgate rules that are reasonably necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The commissioner may seek relief at law or equity to restrain or enjoin any act or practice in violation of this chapter or of any rule promulgated under this chapter. Jurisdiction is conferred upon the chancery and circuit courts of this state to hear and determine such a suit. No bond shall be required for the prosecution of the suit or for the issuance of an injunction.

The commissioner or the commissioner's designee may at all reasonable hours conduct inspections/investigations of contract security companies, proprietary security organizations and security guards/officers to ensure compliance with this chapter.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 29; 1988, ch. 987, § 13; 1996, ch. 1009, § 25; 2011, ch. 3, § 2; 2020, ch. 580, § 16.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “security guards/officers” for “security officers/guards” in (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 580, § 19. July 1, 2020.

62-35-130. Disciplinary powers of commissioner — Civil penalties.

The commissioner may take disciplinary action against a licensee, registrant or applicant, deny an application for a license or registration or may suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew any certificate, certified trainer license, license or registration card under this chapter upon finding that the holder or applicant has:

Violated this chapter or any rule promulgated under this chapter;

Practiced fraud, deceit or misrepresentation;

Knowingly and willfully made a material misstatement in connection with an application for a license or registration card;

Been convicted by a court of competent jurisdiction of any felony or of a misdemeanor. However, an action taken under this subdivision (a)(4) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title;

Committed any act that would have been cause for refusal to issue the license or registration card had it existed and been known to the commissioner at the time of issuance;

Engaged in dishonorable, unethical or unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public;

Willfully deceived or defrauded a member of the public being protected;

Acted as a contract security company or proprietary security company without a currently valid license;

Acted as an armed security guard/officer or unarmed security guard/officer on a registration card that has expired or without a valid registration card as this chapter requires;

Violated any disciplinary order of the commissioner; or

Failed or refused to cooperate with any inspection or investigation to determine compliance with this chapter or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

In addition to or in lieu of any other lawful disciplinary action under this section, the commissioner may assess a civil penalty of up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each statute or rule violation.

The commissioner may assess a civil penalty of up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) per occurrence upon any person who operates without the proper license or other authorization required.

A license or registration card shall be subject to expiration and renewal during any period in which the license or registration card is suspended.

Whenever an armed or unarmed security guard/officer pleads guilty or is convicted of any offense enumerated in this chapter, the licensee must within thirty (30) days notify the commissioner of that conviction and provide the commissioner with certified copies of the conviction. The licensee's license shall automatically be revoked thirty (30) days after the licensee's conviction unless the licensee makes a written request to the commissioner for a hearing during the thirty-day period. Following any such hearing held pursuant to this section, the commissioner may impose upon that licensee any sanction or discipline permitted by this chapter.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 30; 1990, ch. 1026, § 33; 1996, ch. 1009, § 3; 1997, ch. 369, §§ 2, 3; 2010, ch. 729, § 1; 2018, ch. 745, § 18; 2020, ch. 580, § 9.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “armed security guard/officer or unarmed security guard/officer” for “armed or unarmed security officer/guard” in (a)(9).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 580, § 19. July 1, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. Under T.C.A. § 62-35-130(e) licensed armed and unarmed security guards/officers are required to notify the Commissioner of Commerce and insurance only of “conviction[s],” and a guilty plea entered as a condition of judicial diversion is not a “conviction” under T.C.A. § 40-35-313. OAG 16-17, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 18 (5/6/2016).

62-35-131. Regulation by municipalities, counties or other political subdivisions.

No licensee or registrant shall be required to obtain any authorization, permit or license from or to pay any other fee or post a bond in any municipality, county or other political subdivision of this state to engage in any business or activity regulated under this chapter.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), a municipality, county or other political subdivision of this state may impose:

A bona fide business tax; and

Regulations upon any person who furnishes street patrol services, including a requirement that the person register with a designated agency.

When a security guard/officer is working in another jurisdiction other than the security guard/officer's primary county, the chief law enforcement officer of the county in which the security guard/officer is working shall be notified where the security guard/officer will be assigned and the length of the assignment. This shall be done in writing by the employer of the security guard/officer, unless other arrangements are made with the chief law enforcement officer of the county within five (5) days of the date of first service. The chief law enforcement officer and the officers/deputies shall recognize the state-issued security armed card as valid in their jurisdiction while any security guard/officer is traveling to or from a job site and while performing duties while at the job site, or while any representative of a security company, supervisor or officers are traveling to or from job sites or operating as a street patrol service.

The chief law enforcement officer of a county may require an individual to present proof of compliance with this chapter.

The chief law enforcement officer shall waive provisions relative to training for those individuals properly and duly registered and in possession of a valid armed registration card. If a valid objection exists, however, proof or information indicating training should not be waived shall be sent to the commissioner or the commissioner's designee within ten (10) days of the objection, along with a written explanation of the chief law enforcement officer's objection. A security guard/officer shall not work in any jurisdiction in which the chief law enforcement officer has a pending objection to the training qualifications of the security guard/officer.

In any county having a metropolitan form of government, the chief of police shall be the chief law enforcement officer (CLEO). In counties not having a metropolitan form of government the sheriff shall be the CLEO.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 32; 1988, ch. 987, § 14; 1996, ch. 675, § 68; 1996, ch. 1009, § 14; 2001, ch. 452, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for violations of section, § 62-35-136.

Attorney General Opinions. Ability of an armed security guard to carry a weapon on breaks and during off duty hours, OAG 99-189, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 209 (9/22/99).

62-35-132. Reciprocal agreements with officials of other states.

The commissioner may negotiate and enter into reciprocal agreements with appropriate officials in other states to permit licensed or registered contract security companies or security guards/officers who meet or exceed the qualifications established in this chapter to operate across state lines under mutually acceptable terms.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 33.

62-35-133. Copies of chapter and rules.

The commissioner shall provide a copy of this chapter and any rules promulgated under this chapter to:

Each licensee and proprietary security organization every two (2) years, at no charge; and

Any other person, upon request, for a reasonable fee that the commissioner may fix.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 34.

62-35-134. Unlawful employments, publications and activities.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly to employ as a security guard/officer any individual who does not hold a valid registration card of the appropriate type, except as provided in § 62-35-119(c).

It is unlawful for any contract security company knowingly to publish any advertisement, letterhead, circular, statement or phrase of any sort that suggests that the company is a government agency or instrumentality.

It is unlawful for any security guard/officer knowingly to:

Fail to return immediately on demand, or within twenty-four (24) hours of termination of employment, a firearm issued to the security guard/officer by an employer;

Fail to return immediately on demand, or within seven (7) days of termination of employment, any uniform, badge, device, insignia, credential, keys or other item of equipment issued to the security guard/officer by an employer;

Carry a firearm or facsimile of any firearm or item that may leave the impression that the security guard/officer is armed with a firearm of any type in the performance of the security guard/officer's duties if not the holder of a valid armed security guard/officer registration card;

Carry a firearm or facsimile of any firearm or item that may leave the impression that the security guard/officer is armed with a firearm of any type in performance of the security guard/officer's duties if not authorized to carry the firearm;

Make any statement that would reasonably cause another person to believe that the security guard/officer functions as a sworn peace officer or other government official; or

Divulge to anyone other than the security guard/officer's employer or to persons that the security guard/officer's employer may direct or as may be required by law any information acquired during the security guard/officer's employment that may compromise the security of any premises to which the security guard/officer has been assigned by the employer.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 35; 1988, ch. 987, § 15; 1996, ch. 1009, §§ 15, 16; 2020, ch. 580, § 17.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “security guard/officer” for “security officer” and “security guard/officer's” for “security officer's” in (c)(1), (c)(2), the first two occurrences in (c)(3), twice in (c)(4), and throughout (c)(6).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 580, § 19. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Hiring armed guards without permit from governor, § 50-1-102.

Penalty for violation of section, § 62-35-136.

Attorney General Opinions. Statute requiring police officers to provide notice of their authority or grounds for arrest does not apply to security officers; however, a security officer must provide notice of the grounds of an arrest, OAG 03-018, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 23 (2/19/03).

Statute setting forth the grounds for arrest by private citizens governs arrests by security officers, OAG 03-018, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 23 (2/19/03).

Use of speed monitoring equipment by private security guards, OAG 03-088, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 107 (7/15/03).

Unless one of the exemptions listed in T.C.A. § 62-35-103 applies to the individual unarmed security guard, he or she is required to register with the department of commerce and insurance, OAG 06-146, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 167 (9/26/06).

62-35-135. Administrative procedures regarding contested cases.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this chapter.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 31.

62-35-136. Penalty for violations.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or in any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter, a violation of this chapter or any rule promulgated under this chapter is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1987, ch. 436, § 36; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1996, ch. 1009, § 17.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-35-137. Locksmith and private security regulatory fund.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all moneys collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the state treasury in a separate fund to be known as the “locksmith and private security regulatory fund.”

Disbursements from the fund shall be made solely for the purpose of defraying expenses incurred in the implementation and enforcement of the Locksmith Licensing Act of 2006, compiled in chapter 11 of this title, and this chapter.

No such expenses shall be payable from the general fund of the state.

Any part of the locksmith and private security regulatory fund remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund, but shall be carried forward to defray future expenses until all the funds are expended in accordance with the Locksmith Licensing Act of 2006 and this chapter.

Acts 1991, ch. 425, § 5; 2012, ch. 986, § 45.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

62-35-138. Preemption of local regulations.

No city, county or urban county government shall occupy any part of the field of regulation of private protective services unless expressly provided for in this chapter.

Acts 1996, ch. 1009, § 18.

62-35-139. Limitation on exemption from licensing requirements.

No person who is exempt from the licensing requirements of this chapter pursuant to § 62-35-103(13) shall perform any private protective services duties at a shopping center complex or other business facility that has two (2) or more contiguous businesses. A person performing private protective services pursuant to § 62-35-103(13) shall perform the services solely upon the premises of the business of the person's employer.

Acts 2001, ch. 452, § 3.

62-35-140. Continuing education requirements.

Every certified trainer must complete twelve (12) hours of continuing education approved by the commissioner every two (2) years as a prerequisite for renewal. Proof of the continuing education must be submitted to the commissioner in conjunction with the application for renewal.

Acts 2002, ch. 710, § 1; 2008, ch. 1038, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. The version of T.C.A. § 62-35-141 originally enacted by Acts 2002, ch. 846, § 1, has been redesignated as present T.C.A. § 62-35-141, due to multiple enactments at this section.